src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_nijbe_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - nijbe: 
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  nijbe
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  niijbe
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  niijbe
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  niijbán
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  niijbest
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Com:  nijbijn
    nijbe+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  nijbettáá
    nijbe+v1+N+Ess:  nijben
    nijbe+v1+N+Par:  nijbed
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  niijbeh
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  niijbij
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  niijbijd
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  nijbijd
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  niijbijn
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [nijbijguin, nijbijgijn]
    nijbe+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  nijbijttáá

  Noun - lijmá: 
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  lijmá
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  liijmá
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  liijmá
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  liijmán
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  liijmást
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  lijmáin
    lijmá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  lijmáttáá
    lijmá+v1+N+Ess:  lijmán
    lijmá+v1+N+Par:  lijmád
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  liijmáh
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  liijmái
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  liijmáid
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  lijmáid
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  liijmáin
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [lijmáiguin, lijmáigijn]
    lijmá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  lijmáittáá

  Noun - sijmá:
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  sijmá
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  siijmá
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  siijmá
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  siijmán
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  siijmást
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  sijmáin
    sijmá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  sijmáttáá
    sijmá+v1+N+Ess:  sijmán
    sijmá+v1+N+Par:  sijmád
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  siijmáh
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  siijmái
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  siijmáid
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  sijmáid
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  siijmáin
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [sijmáiguin, sijmáigijn]
    sijmá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  sijmáittáá

  Noun - hijvá: 
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  hijvá
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  hiijvá
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  hiijvá
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  hiijván
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  hiijvást
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  hijváin
    hijvá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  hijváttáá
    hijvá+v1+N+Ess:  hijván
    hijvá+v1+N+Par:  hijvád
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  hiijváh
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  hiijvái
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  hiijváid
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  hijváid
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  hiijváin
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [hijváiguin, hijváigijn]
    hijvá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  hijváittáá

  Noun - pijgá:
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  pijgá
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  piijgá
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  piijgá
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  piijgán
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  piijgást
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  pijgáin
    pijgá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  pijgáttáá
    pijgá+v1+N+Ess:  pijgán
    pijgá+v1+N+Par:  pijgád
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  piijgáh
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Gen: piijgái
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  piijgáid
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  pijgáid
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  piijgáin
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [pijgáiguin, pijgáigijn]
    pijgá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  pijgáittáá

  Noun - káigá: 
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  káigá
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  kááigá
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  kááigá
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  kááigán
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  kááigást
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  káigáin
    káigá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  káigáttáá
    káigá+v1+N+Ess:  káigán
    káigá+v1+N+Par:  káigád
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  kááigáh
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  kááigái
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  kááigáid
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  káigáid
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  kááigáin
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [káigáiguin, káigáigijn]
    káigá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  káigáittáá

  Noun - luvdá: 
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  luvdá
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  luuvdá
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  luuvdá
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  luuvdán
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  luuvdást
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  luvdáin
    luvdá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  luvdáttáá
    luvdá+v1+N+Ess:  luvdán
    luvdá+v1+N+Par:  luvdád
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Nom: luuvdáh
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Gen: luuvdái
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvdáid
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  luvdáid
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvdáin
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [luvdáiguin, luvdáigijn]
    luvdá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  luvdáittáá
    
  Noun - sijvo: # ok SIJVO
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  sijvo
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  siijvo
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  siijvo
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  siijvon
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  siijvost
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Com:  sijvoin
    sijvo+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  sijvottáá
    sijvo+v1+N+Ess:  sijvon
    sijvo+v1+N+Par:  sijvod
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  siijvoh
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  siijvoi
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  siijvoid
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  sijvoid
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  siijvoin
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [sijvoiguin, sijvoigijn]
    sijvo+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  sijvoittáá


  Noun - rv1+ijdo: # ok SIJVO
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  rijdo
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  riijdo
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  riijdo
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  riijdon
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  riijdost
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Com:  rijdoin
    rijdo+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  rijdottáá
    rijdo+v1+N+Ess:  rijdon
    rijdo+v1+N+Par:  rijdod
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  riijdoh
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  riijdoi
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  riijdoid
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  rijdoid
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  riijdoin
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [rijdoiguin, rijdoigijn]
    rijdo+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  rijdoittáá

  Noun - pivdo: # ok SIJVO
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  pivdo
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  piivdo
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  piivdo
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  piivdon
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  piivdost
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Com:  pivdoin
    pivdo+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  pivdottáá
    pivdo+v1+N+Ess:  pivdon
    pivdo+v1+N+Par:  pivdod
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  piivdoh
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  piivdoi
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  piivdoid
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  pivdoid
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  piivdoin
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [pivdoiguin, pivdoigijn]
    pivdo+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  pivdoittáá

  Noun - nijtto: # ok
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  nijtto
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  niijto
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  niijto
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  niijton
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Loc: niijtost
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Com:  nijttoin
    nijtto+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  nijtottáá
    nijtto+v1+N+Ess:  nijtton
    nijtto+v1+N+Par:  nijttod
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  niijtoh
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Gen: niijtoi
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  niijtoid
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  nijttoid
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  niijtoin
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [nijtoiguin, nijtoigijn]
    nijtto+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  nijtoittáá
